Colorado, session 2026A, SB063.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-1-802, add (4)
as follows:
25.5-1-802. Medicaid transportation services - safety and
oversight - rules.
(4) (a) A TRANSPORTATION BROKER SHALL CONTRACT WITH AT
LEAST FIVE TRANSPORTATION PROVIDERS TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION
SERVICES TO MEMBERS. A TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER SHALL:
(I) HAVE AT LEAST THREE YEARS OF TRANSPORTATION
EXPERIENCE;
(II) OPERATE A DISPATCH CENTER WITH DRIVER MONITORING
CAPABILITIES;
(III) MAINTAIN A PHYSICAL OFFICE SPACE THAT IS SUITABLE FOR
PROVIDING TRANSPORTATION SERVICES;
(IV) MAINTAIN A WEBSITE TO ACCOMMODATE ONLINE BOOKING;
AND
(V) IMPLEMENT A DRIVER TRAINING PROGRAM, VEHICLE
INSPECTIONS, AND A SUBSTANCE USE TESTING PROGRAM FOR DRIVERS.
(b) A TRANSPORTATION BROKER SHALL:
(I) HANDLE ALL SCHEDULING, TRANSPORTATION, AND BILLING FOR
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE TRANSPORTATION
PROVIDER;
(II) MAINTAIN DETAILED RECORDS OF OPERATION AND
REGISTRATIONS OR CREDENTIALS THE TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER IS
-2- SB26-063

REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH AND WORK WITH THE TRANSPORTATION
PROVIDER AND THE STATE DEPARTMENT TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION
SERVICES;
(III) CONDUCT THE ANNUAL PERFORMANCE REVIEW;
(IV) PROMPTLY ADDRESS AND RESOLVE ALL CLIENT COMPLAINTS;
AND
(V) MAINTAIN AND UTILIZE A DAILY INSPECTION SHEET FOR
VEHICLES USED TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION SERVICES.
(c) UPON RECEIPT OF A CLAIM FOR PAYMENT FOR NONEMERGENCY
MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION TRIPS OF FIFTY-TWO MILES OR MORE, THE
STATE DEPARTMENT MUST ISSUE PAYMENT TO THE TRANSPORTATION
PROVIDER THAT PROVIDED THE NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES WITHIN FOURTEEN CALENDAR DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE CLAIM FOR PAYMENT.
(d) A TRANSPORTATION BROKER SHALL ANNUALLY CONDUCT A
PERFORMANCE REVIEW OF EACH TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER THE
TRANSPORTATION BROKER CONTRACTS WITH TO PROVIDE
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES TO MEMBERS.
(e) A MEMBER WHO UTILIZES NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES MUST BE ABLE TO PREAPPROVE
NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION AND CHOOSE A PREFERRED
TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER TO RECEIVE NONEMERGENCY
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES THROUGH.
(f) DISPUTES THAT ARISE BETWEEN A TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER
AND THE TRANSPORTATION BROKER OR MEMBER MAY BE ADJUDICATED BY
THE STATE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-4-105.
(g) THE STATE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO
-3- SB26-063

IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION (4).
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- SB26-063